Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Legislative  Administration Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts for payment
of the expenses of the Legislative Administration Committee, for the following purposes:
(1) General program ....................... $ 38,179,255
(2) Debt service .............................. $ 10,746,310
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee:
(1) General program.......................  $ 1,467,183
(2) Debt service ..............................  $ 4,828,500
SECTION 3. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Legislative
Administration Committee from the Stores  Revolving Account and the Property and Supplies
Stores Account established in ORS 173.790 are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $300,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for expenses related to the Oregon Capitol History Gateway  from the
Oregon Capitol History Gateway Fund.
SECTION 5.
Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $25,000
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Adminis-
tration Committee, for expenses related to  operations for the Oregon State Capitol
Foundation from the Oregon State Capitol Foundation Operating Fund.
SECTION 6.
There is appropriated to the  Legislative Assembly, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2019, out  of the General Fund, the amount of $17,467,120 for payment of the ex-
penses of the following offices:
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 1
(1) The offices of the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Repre-
sentatives;
(2) The majority and minority offices of the Senate and of the House  of Representatives;
and
(3) The offices of the Secretary of the Senate  and the Chief Clerk of the House of Rep-
resentatives.
SECTION 7. (1) There is appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $23,337,046 for payment of the
expenses of members of the Eightieth Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
(2) There is  appropriated to the Legislative Assembly, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $12,533,782 for payment of  the expenses of
members of the Eighty-First Legislative Assembly of the State of Oregon.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $27,580
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 9.
For the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by  the Legislative
Assembly from the  Lounge Revolving Account established in ORS 171.117, for the costs of
food served in members’ lounges and  reimbursed through receipts on the basis of sales or
by payroll deductions from members, are not limited.
SECTION 10. There is appropriated to the Legislative Counsel Committee, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $14,727,985.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,006,234 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Counsel
Committee.
SECTION 12. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2019, expenditures by the Legislative
Counsel Committee from the ORS Revolving Account established in ORS 171.305 and  from
the Legislative Publications Account established  in ORS 171.245, for services and supplies
connected with printing  and distributing legislative publications and the Oregon Revised
Statutes, are not limited.
SECTION 13. (1) There is appropriated  to the Legislative Fiscal Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $7,838,317.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of $4,450,925 is es-
tablished for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding
lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Legislative Fiscal Officer.
SECTION 14. There is appropriated to the Legislative Policy and Research Committee,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $11,075,753.
SECTION 15. There is appropriated to the Legislative  Revenue Officer, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,850,378.
SECTION 16. There is appropriated to the Commission  on Indian Services, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of $738,206.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of $7,302
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Commission on Indian
Services.
SECTION 18.
(1) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section  13 (2), chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 2
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Legislative Fiscal Officer, is increased by $380,000.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Assembly by section 7  (2), chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is decreased by $1,000,000.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation made to
the Legislative Assembly  by section 6, chapter 577, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 19. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5517 (SB 5517-A) Page 3